Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Administration and Management of the Assets of the Benefit System

47-5-20.
Creation of board of trustees.

There is created a public corporation of this state to be known as “The Board of Trustees of the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System (GMEBS).” Said corporation shall be the successor to the Joint Municipal Employees Retirement System (JMERS) and it is the intent of this chapter that all rights, duties, and obligations of JMERS are assigned to and are assumed by the new system.
The creation of GMEBS shall not increase, diminish, grant, destroy, impair, alter, or otherwise affect any pension, retirement benefit or allowance, survivors benefit, membership or right to membership, creditable service or right thereto, prior service or right thereto, or any option, election, or right of any kind created pursuant to a contract or ordinance or resolution with the Joint Municipal Employees Retirement System in existence on July 1, 1984.
The GMEBS board shall have and be vested with, as a minimum, the same rights, powers, duties, privileges, and authority of any board of a municipal employee benefit program to which the GMEBS board serves as a successor board.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 190, § 4.

47-5-21.
Membership of board.

The board of trustees shall consist of 15 members. To be eligible for membership on the board of trustees, a person must be a citizen of this state. Members of the board of trustees shall be eligible to succeed themselves but shall not serve more than three consecutive full terms.

Except for the term of the initial board, trustees shall be employees or elected or appointed officers of a member employer. Ten trustees shall be elected officers of a municipal corporation. Five trustees shall be employees or appointed officers of a municipal corporation. The initial trustees whose terms shall begin upon appointment and end as follows shall be:

Mayor Hobby Stripling of Vienna, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1985;

Mayor Ernest Whaley of Clarkston, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1985;

Mayor Tracy Stallings of Carrollton, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1985;

Mayor Willis Wombles of Wrightsville, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1985;

City Administrator Robert Schwartz, Garden City, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1985;

Councilman Clyde Kinnett of East Point, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1986;

Mayor Cecil Evans of Tifton, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1986;

Mayor J. I. Youngblood of Ashburn, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1986;

City Manager Wilbur Avera of Thomaston, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1986;

City Manager James Calvin of Toccoa, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1986;

Mayor J. C. Woods of Trion, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1987;

Mayor Robert Knox, Jr., of Thomson, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1987;

Mayor Lillian Webb of Norcross, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1987;

City Clerk Thomas McMinn of Warner Robins, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1987; and

City Manager Alex Howell of Fairburn, Georgia, for a term ending June 30, 1987.

As the initial terms for which appointments have been made expire, future such members shall be chosen in accordance with the bylaws of the board of trustees. Upon the expiration of the initial terms of the trustees as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, should any of the trustees cease to be an employee or an elected or appointed officer of a municipal corporation, the trustee shall no longer be eligible to serve on the board of trustees, and the position shall be deemed to be vacant. Vacancies shall be filled as provided in the bylaws of the board of trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, §§ 4-6; Ga. L. 1966, p. 539, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 3.

47-5-22.
Officers of the board of trustees; election; merger of offices of secretary and treasurer; compensation of the secretary and treasurer; treasurer’s performance bond.

At its first meeting following July 1 in each year, the board of trustees shall elect a chairman, secretary, treasurer, and such other officers as provided in the bylaws of the board. The secretary and the treasurer need not be members of the board; and such offices may, in the discretion of the board of trustees, be combined in one person. The secretary and the treasurer, whether or not members of the board of trustees, may receive such compensation as may be fixed by the board of trustees for the performance of their duties. The treasurer shall give good and sufficient bond in such amount as is required by the board of trustees, and the premium on such bond shall be paid from the administrative funds of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, § 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 4.

47-5-23.
Powers of the board of trustees generally.

The board of trustees shall have the following specific powers, together with such other powers as may be necessary or incidental to such powers in effectuating the purposes of this chapter:

To adopt bylaws governing its operations and procedures;

To contract with municipal corporations and other public bodies of this state and private entities for the use or furnishing of services and facilities necessary, useful, or incident to providing retirement benefits, workers’ compensation benefits, and employee benefits under this chapter;

To determine the actuarial soundness of proposed contracts for the provision of retirement benefits and employee benefits under this chapter and to execute or reject such contracts;

To provide for termination of trusteeship and transfer of assets to successor trustees upon terms specified in the contract for provision of retirement benefits and employee benefits;

To contract with member employers to provide employee benefits through the use of insurance companies, self-funding, or other funding method as determined by the board;

To employ legal counsel;

To employ and contract with actuaries, auditors, accountants, investment advisers, investment brokers, consultants, medical personnel, and other agents and employees;

To collect and disburse all funds due or payable under this chapter;

To adopt mortality tables and other actuarial assumptions to be used for funding purposes and administrative purposes;

To provide for and promulgate all the rules, regulations, and forms that are deemed as necessary or desirable in contracting with member employers, in fulfilling its purposes of providing retirement benefits, workers’ compensation benefits, and employee benefits, and in maintaining proper records and accountings;

To bring and defend actions, sue and be sued, and plead and be impleaded;

To expend funds for the purchase of fidelity and surety bonds and liability insurance for the protection and indemnification of trustees in the performance of their duties;

To expend funds for the reasonable expenses of trustees while engaged in the performance of their duties;

To purchase insurance contracts on the lives of participating employees and pay all premiums thereon;

To employ insurance companies to provide actuarial advice;

To employ insurance companies, banks, trust companies, and investment brokers as agents for the keeping of records and the receipt and disbursement of funds held by or due the trustees;

To serve as trustees of a municipal workers’ compensation group self-insurance fund which is established by employers as defined in paragraph (9) of Code Section 47-5-2 and which is operated pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 9 of Title 34 and rules and regulations of the Georgia Department of Insurance, notwithstanding the definition contained in paragraph (11) of Code Section 34-9-151;

To accept gifts and donations of property of every nature and use such property for the purposes of this chapter; and

To adopt and alter a seal.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, §§ 3, 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 5; Ga. L. 2019, p. 337, § 1-100/SB 132.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Department of Insurance” for “Insurance Department” near the end of paragraph (17).

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-5-24.
Powers of board with regard to funds held by it.

The board of trustees is authorized to invest and reinvest funds held by it in any investments which are legal investments under Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law”. The board of trustees shall have the discretion to decide the allocation of funds among such investments. The board of trustees is further authorized to purchase, acquire, hold, lease, sell, and convey real and personal property.

The board of trustees is authorized to place funds held by it with banks or trust companies which have corporate trust powers and to authorize any such bank or trust company to invest and reinvest such funds for its account, subject to the investment restrictions of subsection (a) of this Code section. The board of trustees shall prescribe the powers and duties of such banks and trust companies in accordance with this chapter. Funds of the board of trustees on deposit with any one such bank or trust company shall not execute 25 percent of the combined capital and surplus of such bank or trust company. Such bank or trust company shall give bond or pledge sufficient federal or municipal securities to secure the deposits of the board of trustees.

The board of trustees is authorized to place funds held by it with insurance companies authorized to do business in this state for the purpose of investment at guaranteed or anticipated rates of interest.

Notwithstanding the investment restrictions of subsection (a) of this Code section, the board of trustees is authorized, for a consideration, to pledge funds held by it to third parties, including lenders, for the purpose of guaranteeing the contract obligations of municipal corporations and other public bodies of this state, providing surety obligations in connection with such contracts, and obligating it to assume any such contracts in the event that the municipal corporation or other public body fails to renew such contract for its full stated term. Such guaranties, sureties, or assumptions shall constitute activities and services that the board of trustees and the contracting municipal corporations or other public bodies are authorized to undertake and provide, and shall be undertaken pursuant to Article IX, Section III, Paragraph I of the Constitution, provided that the full faith and credit of the municipal corporation or other public body receiving the benefit of such guaranty, surety, or assumption is pledged to repay any amounts required to be paid by the board of trustees as a result of such guaranty, surety, or assumption.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, §§ 15-17, 24; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 190, § 5; Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 7.

47-5-25.
Valuation of assets of the retirement system.

The board of trustees shall prescribe in its bylaws the method of valuation of assets, which method shall be in accordance with acceptable accounting practices in use by corporate trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, § 18.

47-5-26.
Duty of board of trustees to file an annual financial report with each member employer; filing of objections to transactions shown in such report.

The board of trustees shall file with each member employer an annual written report showing pertinent transactions affecting its respective retirement fund account, workers’ compensation fund account, or employee benefit fund account since the last previous such report. Within 90 days of the receipt of such report, a member employer may file written objections with the board of trustees with respect to any transactions regarding its account as shown in such report.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, § 22; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 7.

47-5-27.
Payment of administrative expenses of the board of trustees; allocation of expenses among member municipalities.

The administrative expenses of the board of trustees, including all operational expenses, fees, compensation, and other costs, shall be paid from funds held by it and may be chargeable by it to either principal or income or both, as determined by it, as of any valuation date. Further, the board of trustees shall have the authority to allocate expenses among member municipalities on the basis of costs. Administrative expenses for the first year of operation may be assessed against first year contributions in proportion to the number of participating employees.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, § 23; Ga. L. 1966, p. 539, § 7.

47-5-28.
Accounts for participating employees, member employers, and as otherwise required; authorization of funds; commingling restriction.

The board of trustees shall administer the retirement fund and shall maintain records as follows:

The board of trustees shall maintain individual accounts for each participating employee, to which shall be credited the dollar value of participation allocated to such employee under the respective member employer’s retirement plan, and such other accounts, if any, as may be reasonably required, in the discretion of the board of trustees, for the convenient administration of the plan;

There shall be credited to the contribution account of each member employer all contributions received by the board of trustees from it or its participating employees and there shall be charged against such account all payments made from it pursuant to the terms of the retirement plan, together with any other payment or expenses chargeable against that account;

The interest of each member employer in any retirement fund established under the system shall be represented by units which shall constitute equal interest in any such fund; and

The board of trustees may from time to time establish new or additional retirement funds and may separate and place new contributions in such funds instead of adding to existing funds, provided that member employers continue to be represented by units which constitute equal interests in such funds.

The board of trustees may establish a workers’ compensation fund, employee benefit fund, and other funds necessary or incident to the provision of workers’ compensation benefits and employee benefits under this chapter.

The retirement fund shall not be commingled with the workers’ compensation fund, employee benefit fund, or other funds.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, § 18; Ga. L. 1966, p. 539, § 6; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 8.

47-5-29.
Periodic determination of principal and income of the funds; periodic merger of principal and income; method for determination of principal value of each unit of funds.

The board of trustees shall determine the principal and income of the retirement fund, workers’ compensation fund, employee benefit fund, and other funds on periodic evaluation dates established by the board of trustees, but at least once every 12 months. Income shall be determined by the board of trustees in accordance with an established method which it may prescribe in its bylaws and which conforms to acceptable accounting practices in use by corporate trustees. Income shall be added to and become part of the principal of the various funds on the periodic valuation dates established under this Code section. The board of trustees shall deduct from either principal or income, or both, such charges, expenses, and liabilities as it determines in its discretion to be chargeable against either.

The principal value of each unit into which the funds are divided shall be determined on each such periodic valuation date by dividing the then principal value of the funds by the number of units into which it is then divided.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, §§ 19, 20; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 9.

47-5-30.
Periodic audit of the accounts of the board of trustees; contents and availability of report of such audit; standard of care in conduct of the audit and liability of auditors.

At least once every 12 months an audit shall be made of the retirement fund, workers’ compensation fund, employee benefit fund, and other funds by independent certified public accountants responsible only to and appointed by the board of trustees. The compensation and reasonable expenses of any independent public accountants may be charged to the funds and apportioned between the principal and income as the board of trustees may deem proper.

The auditors appointed shall audit the accounts of the board of trustees and shall make a report of such audit, which report shall include a list of the investments and other assets comprising the various funds on the last day of the period covered by such audit and shall show the valuation placed on each such investment and asset as of that date. The report shall also include a statement of charges, sales, and any other investment charges, and of all income and disbursements since the last audit, and appropriate comments as to any investment in default as to principal or interest. Promptly upon receipt by the board of trustees of such report, the board of trustees shall send notice to each employer to which a regular periodic accounting would ordinarily be rendered that the report is available and that a copy will be furnished upon request. Such audits shall be included with the annual written report filed with each member employer pursuant to Code Section 47-5-26.

In auditing the accounts of the board of trustees, the auditors shall be required to make only such examination of the accounts and records as they deem reasonably necessary. The auditors shall incur no liability for any act done or suffered by them in good faith in the exercise of reasonable care.

The auditors shall include in their report their unqualified opinion on the presentation of the financial position and operations of the fund. If such auditors are unable to express an unqualified opinion, they shall so state and shall further detail reasons for their qualification or disclaimer, including recommendations for improvements.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 10; Ga. L. 1992, p. 477, § 1.